Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 2. Licenses and Permits.
Sec. 04.11.180.
Common carrier dispensary license.

A common carrier dispensary license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption aboard a vehicle, boat, or train licensed by a state or federal agency for passenger travel, or aboard aircraft operated by an airline licensed by a state or federal agency for passenger travel.

Except for a common carrier that is an airline, a common carrier shall obtain a license for each vehicle, boat, or train in which alcoholic beverages are served. After obtaining an initial license for the first vehicle, boat, or train, the common carrier may obtain additional licenses for additional vehicles, boats, or trains upon making a written request identifying the vehicle, boat, or train in the manner prescribed by the board, and paying the biennial fee for additional licensed premises as required by (c) of this section.

Except as provided for airlines under (d) of this section, the biennial fee for a common carrier dispensary license is $1,000 for each of the first 10 licenses a common carrier holds and $100 for each additional license issued to the common carrier after the first 10 licenses.

The biennial fee for a common carrier dispensary license issued to an airline is the fee specified under (c) of this section for each aircraft in which alcoholic beverages are served or $2,000 for each community served by the airline. An airline shall specify the fee applicable to the license at the time of the airline’s application for issuance or renewal of the license.

Upon request of the common carrier and payment of the proportionate prorated applicable fee, the board shall change the license period of a license for a vehicle, boat, or train to allow registration to occur in the biennial period of the balance of the licensee’s common carrier licenses.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Sec. 04.11.180.
Common carrier dispensary license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 2003; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.190.
Community liquor license. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.200.
Retail stock sale license.

A retail stock sale license authorizes the holder to sell the remaining stock of a package liquor store when the owner wishes to close out or terminate the business of the store.

A sale by a holder of a retail stock sale license may only be in quantities of five gallons or more per sale and may only be to persons licensed under this chapter.

The retail stock sale license shall be issued for a period of 90 days from the expiration or forfeiture of the package store license and is not renewable.

The retail stock sale license shall be issued only if the owner of the package store business does not have a current package store license. However, if the owner had a package store license that was suspended or revoked, the retail stock sale license may not be issued.

The retail stock sale license fee is $100.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Sec. 04.11.200.
Retail stock sale license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 85 SLA 1988; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.210.
Recreational site license.

The holder of a recreational site license may sell beer and wine at a recreational site during and one hour before and after a recreational event that is not a school event, for consumption on designated areas at the site.

The biennial fee for a recreational site license is $800.

The board may not deny an application for renewal of a license issued under this section or an application to transfer a license issued under this section to another person solely because the board determines that the licensed premises is not a “recreational site” as defined under (e) of this section if the applicant

held a license under this section or received a transferred license under this section that was valid at any time between January 1, 2018, and March 31, 2019 or holds a license that was initially issued under (d) of this section; and

operates the license under the same conditions required at the time of initial licensure.

The board may not deny an application for issuance of a new license under this section solely because the board determines that the licensed premises is not a “recreational site” as defined in (e) of this section if the applicant filed an application for a new license under this section between October 1, 2018, and July 6, 2019.

In this section, “recreational site” includes a location where baseball games, car races, hockey games, dog sled racing events, or curling matches are regularly held during a season.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (c) and (d) were enacted as (d) and (e), respectively, and relettered in 2019, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as (e), and internal references in (c) — (e) were conformed.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 6, 2019, added (d) [now(c)], effective retroactively to January 1, 2018; added (e) [now (d)], effective retroactively to October 1, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

Section 6,
ch. 10, SLA 2019, makes the 2019 addition of subsection (c) retroactive to January 1, 2018 and subsection (d) retroactive to October 1, 2018.

Sec. 04.11.210.
Recreational site license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2019; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.220.
Pub license.

A pub license authorizes the holder to sell beer and wine for consumption only at a designated premises located on the campus of an accredited college or university.

Only one pub license may be issued or renewed for each college or university campus in the state.

A pub license may not be issued or renewed without the written approval of the governing body of the college or university.

The biennial fee for a pub license is $800.

In this section, an “accredited college or university” means a college or university accredited by the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Sec. 04.11.220.
Pub license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2013; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.225.
Outdoor recreation lodge license.

An outdoor recreation lodge license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages to a registered overnight guest or off-duty staff of the lodge for consumption on the licensed premises or in conjunction with purchased outdoor recreation activities provided by the licensee. An outdoor recreation lodge license may not be transferred.

The biennial fee for an outdoor recreation lodge license is $1,250.

In this section, “outdoor recreation lodge” means a licensed business that provides overnight accommodations and meals, is primarily involved in offering opportunities for persons to engage in outdoor recreation activities, and has a minimum of two guest rooms.

History.

(§ 6 ch 41 SLA 2005)

Sec. 04.11.225.
Outdoor recreation lodge license.

History.

[§ 6 ch 41 SLA 2005; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.230.
Caterer’s permit.

A caterer’s permit authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages at conventions, picnics, social gatherings, sporting events, or similar affairs held off the holder’s licensed premises. The permit may only be issued for designated premises for a specific occasion and for a limited period of time.

The written approval of a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the site of the occasion for which the permit is sought must be obtained and accompany the application.

A caterer’s permit may not be transferred or renewed.

A caterer’s permit must be surrendered to the board, its agent, or the law enforcement agency approving the permit within 48 hours of its expiration time. Failure to surrender the permit is cause, in the discretion of the board, for denial of applications for permits made in the future by the permittee.

The fee for a caterer’s permit is $50 and shall accompany the application for a permit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may exclude the area used for Monte Carlo/Casino Night activities from a caterer’s permit issued under this section.
March 3, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.230.
Caterer’s permit.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.240.
Special events permit.

A special events permit authorizes the holder to sell or dispense beer or wine for consumption at designated premises for a specific occasion and limited period of time. Only nonprofit fraternal, civic, or patriotic organizations active for a period of at least two years before application and incorporated under AS 10.20 are eligible for a special events permit, and only if all profits derived from the sale of beer or wine are paid to the organization and not to an individual.

An application for a special events permit must be received in the main office of the board at least 10 days before the date for which the permit is requested. The application must be signed by both the president and secretary of the organization applying for the permit. A sworn affidavit showing the length of time the organization has been in existence must accompany the application, together with a certified copy of the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the application. The written approval of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the designated premises of the occasion for which the permit is sought must also be obtained and accompany the application.

The special events permit must be surrendered to the board, its agent, or the law enforcement agency approving the permit, within 48 hours of its expiration time. Failure to surrender the permit is cause, in the discretion of the board, for denial of applications for permits made in the future by the organization. No more than five special events permits may be granted to an organization, including its auxiliary, in any one calendar year.

A special events permit may not be transferred or renewed.

The fee for a special events permit is $50 a day.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.240.
Special events permit.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.250.
Conditional contractor’s permit.

A conditional contractor’s permit authorizes the holder to sell beer or wine for consumption only on designated premises for two years from the date of issuance of the permit at construction sites that are located outside a city and inside the boundaries of a military or naval reservation.

An applicant for a conditional contractor’s permit must obtain and file with the board written permission from the commanding officer of the military or naval reservation and the prime contractor of the remotely situated project for the conduct of the activities authorized by the permit. A conditional contractor’s permit may be renewed biennially upon reapplication for a permit and may be revoked or suspended at the discretion of the commanding officer or the prime contractor.

A conditional contractor’s permit may not be transferred and is not valid after the completion of the holder’s contract or the closing of the military or naval reservation.

The biennial conditional contractor’s permit fee is $1,200.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Sec. 04.11.250.
Conditional contractor’s permit.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 63 SLA 1993; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.255.
Destination resort license.

A destination resort license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages at a destination resort for consumption on the licensed premises in conjunction with the visitor activities provided by the licensee to cruise ship passengers and staff and other visitors while the cruise ship is in port at this resort. A destination resort license may not be transferred.

The biennial fee for a destination resort license is $1,250.

For purposes of this section, the term “destination resort” means a business that owns a site of at least 20 acres that is used principally as a destination for cruise ships and other vessels that carry a minimum of 50 passengers and that does not provide overnight lodging on its premises for visitors.

History.

(§ 5 ch 25 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

04.11.260

. Renumbered in 2007.

Sec. 04.11.255.
Destination resort license.

History.

[§ 5 ch 25 SLA 2007; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]